Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF356.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1548XS (2) 91 ss/ns S.F. 356 Section 1. Section 43.101, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 43.101 County central committee officers. 3 The county central committee shall elect a chair, co-chair, 4 secretary, treasurer, and other officers as it may determine. 5 The term of office of an officer begins at the time specified 6 by the partyâs state constitution or bylaws and continues for 7 two years and until the officerâs successor is elected and 8 qualified, unless the officer dies, resigns, or is sooner 9 removed by the county central committee for inattention to duty 10 or incompetency , but in any event an officer shall not serve a 11 term of longer than two years . 12